Vermont, session 2025-2026, H149.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 495 is amended to read:
§ 495. UNLAWFUL EMPLOYMENT PRACTICE
(a) It shall be unlawful employment practice, except where a bona fide
occupational qualification requires persons of a particular race, color, religion,
national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry, place of birth,
age, crime victim status, or physical or mental condition:
* * *
(7) For any employer, employment agency, labor organization, or
person seeking employees to discriminate between employees on the basis of
sex, race, national origin, sexual orientation, or gender identity, color, religion,
ancestry, place of birth, age, or crime victim status or against a qualified
VT LEG #379124 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.149
2025 Page 2 of 3
individual with a disability by paying wages to employees of one sex, race,
national origin, sexual orientation, or gender identity, color, religion, ancestry,
place of birth, age, or crime victim status or an employee who is a qualified
individual with a disability at a rate less than the rate paid to employees of the
other sex or a different race, national origin, sexual orientation, or gender
identity, color, religion, ancestry, place of birth, age, or crime victim status or
without the physical or mental condition of the qualified individual with a
disability for equal work that requires equal skill, effort, and responsibility and
is performed under similar working conditions. An employer who is paying
wages in violation of this section shall not reduce the wage rate of any other
employee in order to comply with this subsection.
(A) An employer may pay different wage rates under this subsection
(a) when the differential wages are made pursuant to:
(i) A seniority system.
(ii) A merit system.
(iii) A system in which earnings are based on quantity or quality
of production.
(iv) A bona fide factor other than sex, race, national origin, sexual
orientation, or gender identity, color, religion, ancestry, place of birth, age,
crime victim status, or physical or mental condition. An employer asserting
that differential wages are paid pursuant to this subdivision (7)(A)(iv) shall
VT LEG #379124 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.149
2025 Page 3 of 3
demonstrate that the factor does not perpetuate a differential in compensation
based on sex, race, national origin, sexual orientation, or gender identity, color,
religion, ancestry, place of birth, age, crime victim status, or physical or mental
condition; is job-related with respect to the position in question; and is based
upon a legitimate business consideration.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379124 v.1